Washington statutes.
RCW 43.362.020

Regional transfer of development rights program.

Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department shall fund a process to develop a regional transfer of development rights program that comports with chapter 36.70A RCW that:

(1) Encourages King, Kitsap, Pierce, and Snohomish counties, and the cities within these counties, to participate in the development and implementation of regional frameworks and mechanisms that make transfer of development rights programs viable and successful. The department shall encourage and embrace the efforts in any of these counties or cities to develop local transfer of development rights programs. In fulfilling the requirements of this chapter, the department shall work with the Puget Sound regional council and its growth management policy board to develop a process that satisfies the requirements of this chapter. In the development of a process to create a regional transfer of development rights program, the Puget Sound regional council and its growth management policy board shall develop policies to discourage, or prohibit if necessary, the transfer of development rights from a sending area that would negatively impact the future economic viability of the sending area. The department shall also work with an advisory committee to develop a regional transfer of development rights marketplace that includes, but is not limited to, supporting strategies for financing infrastructure and conservation. The department shall establish an advisory committee of nine stakeholders with representatives of the following interests:

(a) Two qualified nongovernmental organizations with expertise in the transfer of development rights. At least one organization must have a statewide expertise in growth management planning and in the transfer of development rights and at least one organization must have a local perspective on market-based conservation strategies and transfer of development rights;

(b) Two representatives from real estate and development;

(c) One representative with a county government perspective;

(d) Two representatives from cities of different sizes and geographic areas within the four-county region; and

(e) Two representatives of the agricultural industry; and

(2) Allows the department to utilize recommendations of the interested local governments, nongovernmental entities, and the Puget Sound regional council to develop recommendations and strategies for a regional transfer of development rights marketplace with supporting strategies for financing infrastructure and conservation that represents the consensus of the governmental and nongovernmental parties engaged in the process. However, if agreement between the parties cannot be reached, the department shall make recommendations to the legislature that seek to balance the needs and interests of the interested governmental and nongovernmental parties. The department may contract for expertise to accomplish any of the following tasks. Recommendations developed under this subsection must:

(a) Identify opportunities for cities, counties, and the state to achieve significant benefits through using transfer of development rights programs and the value in modifying criteria by which capital budget funds are allocated, including but not limited to, existing state grant programs to provide incentives for local governments to implement transfer of development rights programs;

(b) Address challenges to the creation of an efficient and transparent transfer of development rights market, including the creation of a transfer of development rights bank, brokerage, or direct buyer-seller exchange;

(c) Address issues of certainty to buyers and sellers of development rights that address long-term environmental benefits and perceived inequities in land values and permitting processes;

(d) Address the means for assuring that appropriate values are recognized and updated, as well as specifically addressing the need to maintain the quality of life in receiving neighborhoods and the protection of environmental values over time;

(e) Identify opportunities and challenges that, if resolved, would result in cities throughout the Puget Sound region participating in a transfer of development rights market;

(f) Compare the uses of a regional transfer of development rights program to other existing land conservation strategies to protect rural and resource lands and implement the growth management act; and

(g) Identify appropriate sending areas so as to protect future growth and economic development needs of the sending areas.

[ 2007 c 482 s 3.]